apertium-lit.lit.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?> 
<dictionary>   
  <alphabet>AĄBCČDEĘĖFGHIĮYJKLMNOPRSŠTUŲŪVZŽaąbcčdeęėfghiįyjklmnoprsštuųūvzž</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"         c="Daiktavardis"/>
    <sdef n="np"        c="Tikrinis daiktavardis"/>
    <sdef n="top"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="vblex"     c="Veiksmažodis"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"     c="Būti"/>
    <sdef n="adj"       c="Būdvardis"/>
    <sdef n="prn"       c="įvardis"/>
    <sdef n="num"       c="Skaitvardis"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"    c="Jungtukas"/>
    <sdef n="pr"        c="Prielinksnis"/>
    <sdef n="adv"       c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="f"         c="Moteriška"/>
    <sdef n="m"         c="Vyriška"/>
    <sdef n="mf"        c="Niekatroji"/>
    <sdef n="nt"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="sp"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="sg"        c="Vienaskaita"/>
    <sdef n="du"        c="Dviskaita"/>
    <sdef n="pl"        c="Daugiskaita"/>
    <sdef n="nom"       c="Vardininkas"/>
    <sdef n="gen"       c="Kilmininkas"/>
    <sdef n="dat"       c="Naudininkas"/>
    <sdef n="acc"       c="Galininkas"/>
    <sdef n="ins"       c="įnagininkas"/>
    <sdef n="loc"       c="Vietininkas"/>
    <sdef n="ill"       c="Iliatyvas/kryptininkas"/>
    <sdef n="voc"       c="Šauksmininkas"/>
    <sdef n="pst"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="comp"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="sup"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="dem"       c="demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"       c="interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="p1"        c="Pirmasis asmuo"/>
    <sdef n="p2"        c="Antrasis asmuo"/>
    <sdef n="p3"        c="Trečiasis asmuo"/>
    <sdef n="pri"       c="present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"      c="past"/>
    <sdef n="pfi"       c="past frequentative indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="pp"        c=""/>
    <sdef n="act"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="sint"      c=""/>   
    <sdef n="abbr"      c=""/>   

    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="percent" 	c="Percent"/>
    <sdef n="roman" 	c="Roman numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="quot"      c="Quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio" 	c="Hyphen"/>    

  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>        
    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><p><l>№</l><r>№</r></p><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([ ][0-9]+)+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<!--      <e><re>[IXV]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="roman"/></r></p></e>-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>–</l><r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!…"]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«“]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»”]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Abbreviations -->     

    <pardef n="m.__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/><j/>.<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="piln.__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numerals -->     
    <pardef n="vien/as__num">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ame</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iems</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oje</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oms</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ose</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omis</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>as<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="d/u__num">
      <e><p><l>viejų</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viem</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viejuose</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viem</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viejų</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viem</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viejose</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>viem</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>u<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="vienas"><i>vien</i><par n="vien/as__num"/></e>
    <e lm="du"><i>d</i><par n="d/u__num"/></e>
    <e lm="piln."><i>piln.</i><par n="piln.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="m."><i>m.</i><par n="m.__abbr"/></e>
     <e><par n="coma"/></e>
     <e><par n="separa"/></e>
     <e><par n="guio"/></e>
     <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
     <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
     <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
     <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
